Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8242
Department; duties.

The department shall:

(1) Maintain the statewide trauma registry pursuant to section 71-8248 to assess the effectiveness of trauma delivery and modify standards and other requirements of the statewide trauma system to improve the provision of emergency medical services and trauma care;

(2) Develop patient outcome measures to assess the effectiveness of trauma care in the system;

(3) Develop standards for regional trauma care quality assurance programs; and

(4) Coordinate and develop trauma prevention and education programs.

The department shall administer funding allocated to the department for the purpose of creating, maintaining, or enhancing the statewide trauma system.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 42;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 102;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 112.